Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 7. Off-Road Recreational Vehicles

Cross references. —

For limitations on use of off-road recreational vehicles, see §

31-5-124

.

As to general registration requirements for vehicles, see article 2 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 137, § 2, and Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1, both enacted a new article 7 in chapter 2 of this title. The article enacted by ch. 137, § 2, was redesignated as article 8 at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

§ 31-2-701.
Definitions.

Except as otherwise provided, as used in this act:

“Off-road recreational vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K);

“Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail” means an off-road recreational vehicle trail, route, road or area specifically designated, marked or signed by the department of state parks and cultural resources as a Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 12, § 2; 2011, ch. 8, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(ii), inserted “route, road.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-2-702.
Registration selling agents; application for trail user registration decal; affidavit required if vehicle serial number not visible; penalty.

The department of state parks and cultural resources through the division of state parks and historic sites, shall in accordance with W.S.

36-4-123

, appoint agents to sell off-road recreational vehicle trail user registration decals. Each selling agent shall retain one dollar ($1.00) for each trail user registration decal sold. Designated department employees may sell trail registration user decals under this article and if decals are sold, the employee shall not receive any commission on user registration fees collected under this article.

Beginning January 1, 2002, each owner of an off-road recreational vehicle shall for each vehicle used on Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trails as established and administered by the department, annually file in writing and in duplicate with any designated registration selling agent, an application for trail user registration of the off-road recreational vehicle. The application shall state the name and address of the owner, the name of the applicant and the make, model and identifying serial number of the off-road recreational vehicle. If the vehicle identifying serial number is not legible or visible, the applicant shall upon a form provided by the department, provide proof of ownership by affidavit certified in writing. Any person knowingly presenting a false or fraudulent statement under this subsection is subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

6-5-303

.

Any person who operates an off-road recreational vehicle on any Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trail without a decal required under this article or in violation of the provisions of W.S.

31-5-1601

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 12, § 2.

§ 31-2-703.
Required user registration fee; disposition of fees; duties of department of state parks and cultural resources.

The owner of an off-road recreational vehicle which will be operated on Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trails shall, upon filing of an application, pay to the registration selling agent an annual user registration fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00).

The registration selling agent shall forward to the department of state parks and cultural resources the original copy of the user registration application together with fourteen dollars ($14.00) collected under subsection (a) of this section and all voluntary fees collected under subsection (e) of this section.

There is created an off-road recreational vehicle trails account. Except as provided in this subsection, the fees received by the department of state parks and cultural resources under this article shall be deposited into the account created by this subsection and shall be expended by the department for the administration of the off-road recreational vehicle trails program. All voluntary fees collected under paragraph (e)(i) of this section shall be deposited in the search and rescue account created by W.S. 19-13-301(a). All fees collected under paragraph (e)(ii) of this section shall be deposited in the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall:

Administer the Wyoming off-road recreational vehicle trails program;

Furnish a sufficient quantity of numbered decals and application forms to each registration selling agent;

Keep full and complete records of all registered off-road recreational vehicles; and

Consult with the Wyoming trails advisory council to assist the department to establish and maintain adequate off-road recreational vehicle trails.

Off-road recreational vehicle registration fee forms shall contain information about the voluntary fees under this subsection. In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons paying a registration fee for off-road recreational vehicles may pay a voluntary fee:

Of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities;

Of any whole dollar amount to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (c), deleted “within the enterprise fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “and all voluntary fees collected under subsection (e) of this section” in (b); added “Except as provided in this subsection,” preceding “the fees”; added the last sentence in (c); and added (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) substituted “paragraph (e)(i)” for “subsection (e)” and added the last sentence; and rewrote (e), which read, “In addition to the fees under subsection (a) of this section, persons paying a registration fee for off-road recreational vehicles may pay a voluntary fee of two dollars ($2.00) or any greater amount to fund search and rescue activities. Off-road recreational vehicle registration fee forms shall contain information about the voluntary fee under this subsection.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 31-2-704.
Payment of fees; issuance of numbered decal; trespass warning printed on decal.

Upon receipt of user registration fees imposed under this article, the selling agent shall issue a numbered decal which shall be prominently displayed on the off-road recreational vehicle.

Numbered decals issued under this article shall contain the following language: “Warning: trespass upon private property while operating an off-road recreational vehicle is punishable by imprisonment up to six (6) months, a fine up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, under W.S.

6-3-303

.”

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1.

§ 31-2-705.
Lost, mutilated or destroyed decal.

In the event of loss, mutilation or destruction of any numbered decal, the owner of an off-road recreational vehicle may obtain a duplicate or new numbered decal from any authorized selling agent or any employee of the department of state parks and cultural resources upon filing an affidavit explaining the loss, mutilation or destruction of the original numbered decal and paying a fee of two dollars ($2.00). The selling agent shall forward to the department of state parks and cultural resources one dollar ($1.00) of each fee collected under this section to be deposited in the account created by W.S. 31-2-703(c).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1.

§ 31-2-706.
Duration of decal.

Each decal issued under this article is effective for the calendar year and shall expire on December 31 of the registration year.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1.

§ 31-2-707.
Exemptions.

Off-road recreational vehicles owned or used by a governmental agency are exempt from this article.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, the off-road recreational vehicle trail user registration required under this article may be waived on an annual basis by the director of the department of state parks and cultural resources for any area designated by the department through a cooperative agreement whereby other governmental agencies agree to contribute to the off-road recreational vehicle trail maintenance and grooming for that area.

Off-road recreational vehicles, when being operated for agricultural use, including but not limited to irrigation, fencing or moving livestock, are exempt from this article.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 182, § 1; 2011, ch. 158, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2011, ch. 158, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.